Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 10.5
FLAG OF THE UNITED STATES

Section

29-10.5-101. Display of flag of the United States - legislative declaration - definitions.

Any local government that purchases a flag of the United States for display may only display such flag if it has been made in the United States.

For purposes of this article, "local government" means a county, a municipality as defined in section 31-1-101 (6), C.R.S., a school district, or a special district formed in accordance with the provisions of title 32, C.R.S.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the matter addressed in this article is a matter of statewide concern.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire article added, p. 94, § 2, effective September 11, 2009.